Illinois, session 104th, SB1745.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Film Production Services Tax Credit Act of 52008 is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 16/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 8    "Above-the-line spending" means all salary, wages, fees, 9and fringe benefits paid for services performed by personnel 10of the production that are considered above-the-line services 11in the film and television industry, including, but not 12limited to, services performed by a producer, executive 13producer, co-producer, director, screenwriter, lead cast, 14supporting cast, or day player. 15    "Accredited production" means: (i) for productions 16commencing before May 1, 2006, a film, video, or television 17production that has been certified by the Department in which 18the aggregate Illinois labor expenditures included in the cost 19of the production, in the period that ends 12 months after the 20time principal filming or taping of the production began, 21exceed $100,000 for productions of 30 minutes or longer, or 22$50,000 for productions of less than 30 minutes; and (ii) for 23productions commencing on or after May 1, 2006, a film, video,   SB1745- 2 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1or television production that has been certified by the 2Department in which the Illinois production spending included 3in the cost of production in the period that ends 12 months 4after the time principal filming or taping of the production 5began exceeds $100,000 for productions of 30 minutes or longer 6or exceeds $50,000 for productions of less than 30 minutes. 7"Accredited production" does not include a production that:8        (1) is news, current events, or public programming, or 9    a program that includes weather or market reports; 10        (2) is a talk show produced for local or regional 11    markets; 12        (3) (blank); 13        (4) is a sports event or activity; 14        (5) is a gala presentation or awards show; 15        (6) is a finished production that solicits funds; 16        (7) is a production produced by a film production 17    company if records, as required by 18 U.S.C. 2257, are to 18    be maintained by that film production company with respect 19    to any performer portrayed in that single media or 20    multimedia program; or 21        (8) is a production produced primarily for industrial, 22    corporate, or institutional purposes. 23    "Accredited animated production" means an accredited 24production in which movement and characters' performances are 25created using a frame-by-frame technique and a significant 26number of major characters are animated. Motion capture by   SB1745- 3 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1itself is not an animation technique. 2    "Accredited production certificate" means a certificate 3issued by the Department certifying that the production is an 4accredited production that meets the guidelines of this Act.5    "Applicant" means a taxpayer that is a film production 6company that is operating or has operated an accredited 7production located within the State of Illinois and that (i) 8owns the copyright in the accredited production throughout the 9Illinois production period or (ii) has contracted directly 10with the owner of the copyright in the accredited production 11or a person acting on behalf of the owner to provide services 12for the production, where the owner of the copyright is not an 13eligible production corporation. 14    "Below-the-line spending" means salary, wages, fees, and 15fringe benefits paid for services performed by a person in a 16position that is off camera and who provides technical 17services during the physical production of a film. 18"Below-the-line spending" does not include salary, wages, 19fees, or fringe benefits paid to a person who is a producer, 20executive producer, co-producer, director, screenwriter, lead 21cast, supporting cast, or day player, or who performs other 22services that are customarily considered above-the-line 23services in the film and television industry. 24    "Credit" means: 25        (1) for an accredited production approved by the 26    Department on or before January 1, 2005 and commencing   SB1745- 4 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1    before May 1, 2006, the amount equal to 25% of the Illinois 2    labor expenditure approved by the Department. The 3    applicant is deemed to have paid, on its balance due day 4    for the year, an amount equal to 25% of its qualified 5    Illinois labor expenditure for the tax year. For Illinois 6    labor expenditures generated by the employment of 7    residents of geographic areas of high poverty or high 8    unemployment, as determined by the Department, in an 9    accredited production commencing before May 1, 2006 and 10    approved by the Department after January 1, 2005, the 11    applicant shall receive an enhanced credit of 10% in 12    addition to the 25% credit; and13        (2) for an accredited production commencing on or 14    after May 1, 2006 and before January 1, 2009, the amount 15    equal to:16            (i) 20% of the Illinois production spending for 17        the taxable year; plus18            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 19        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 20        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 21        determined by the Department; and22        (3) for an accredited production commencing on or 23    after January 1, 2009, the amount equal to: 24            (i) 30% of the Illinois production spending for 25        the taxable year; plus 26            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures   SB1745- 5 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 2        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 3        determined by the Department. 4    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity.6    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity.8    "Fair market value" means: 9        (1) for unrelated parties, the value established 10    through comparable transactions between unrelated parties 11    for substantially similar goods and services considering 12    the geographic market and other pertinent variables as 13    specified by the Department by rule; and 14        (2) for related parties, the value established through 15    the related party's historical dealings with unrelated 16    parties or established by comparable transactions between 17    other unrelated parties for substantially similar goods 18    and services considering the geographic market and other 19    pertinent variables as specified by the Department by 20    rule. 21    "Illinois labor expenditure" means salary or wages paid to 22employees of the applicant for services on the accredited 23production.24    To qualify as an Illinois labor expenditure, the 25expenditure must be: 26        (1) Reasonable in the circumstances.   SB1745- 6 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1        (2) Included in the federal income tax basis of the 2    property. 3        (3) Incurred by the applicant for services on or after 4    January 1, 2004. 5        (4) Incurred for the production stages of the 6    accredited production, from the final script stage to the 7    end of the post-production stage. 8        (5) Limited to the first $25,000 of wages paid or 9    incurred to each employee of a production commencing 10    before May 1, 2006 and the first $100,000 of wages paid or 11    incurred to each employee of a production commencing on or 12    after May 1, 2006 and prior to July 1, 2022. For 13    productions commencing on or after July 1, 2022, limited 14    to the first $500,000 of wages paid or incurred to each 15    eligible nonresident or resident employee of a production 16    company or loan out company that provides in-State 17    services to a production, whether those wages are paid or 18    incurred by the production company, loan out company, or 19    both, subject to withholding payments provided for in 20    Article 7 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. For purposes of 21    calculating Illinois labor expenditures for a television 22    series, the eligible nonresident wage limitations provided 23    under this subparagraph are applied to the entire season. 24    For the purpose of this paragraph (5), an eligible 25    nonresident is a nonresident whose wages qualify as an 26    Illinois labor expenditure under the provisions of   SB1745- 7 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1    paragraph (9) that apply to that production. 2        (6) For a production commencing before May 1, 2006, 3    exclusive of the salary or wages paid to or incurred for 4    the 2 highest paid employees of the production.5        (7) Directly attributable to the accredited 6    production. 7        (8) (Blank). 8        (9) Prior to July 1, 2022, paid to persons resident in 9    Illinois at the time the payments were made. For a 10    production commencing on or after July 1, 2022, paid to 11    persons resident in Illinois and nonresidents at the time 12    the payments were made. 13        For purposes of this subparagraph, if the production 14    is accredited by the Department before the effective date 15    of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, only 16    wages paid to nonresidents working in the following 17    positions shall be considered Illinois labor expenditures: 18    Writer, Director, Director of Photography, Production 19    Designer, Costume Designer, Production Accountant, VFX 20    Supervisor, Editor, Composer, and Actor, subject to the 21    limitations set forth under this subparagraph. For an 22    accredited Illinois production spending of $25,000,000 or 23    less, no more than 2 nonresident actors' wages shall 24    qualify as an Illinois labor expenditure. For an 25    accredited production with Illinois production spending of 26    more than $25,000,000, no more than 4 nonresident actor's   SB1745- 8 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1    wages shall qualify as Illinois labor expenditures. 2        For purposes of this subparagraph, if the production 3    is accredited by the Department on or after the effective 4    date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, 5    wages paid to nonresidents shall qualify as Illinois labor 6    expenditures only under the following conditions:7            (A) the nonresident must be employed in a 8        qualified position;9            (B) for each of those accredited productions, the 10        wages of not more than 9 nonresidents who are employed 11        in a qualified position other than Actor shall qualify 12        as Illinois labor expenditures;13            (C) for an accredited production with Illinois 14        production spending of $25,000,000 or less, no more 15        than 2 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 16        Illinois labor expenditures; and 17            (D) for an accredited production with Illinois 18        production spending of more than $25,000,000, no more 19        than 4 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 20        Illinois labor expenditures. 21        As used in this paragraph (9), "qualified position" 22    means: Writer, Director, Director of Photography, 23    Production Designer, Costume Designer, Production 24    Accountant, VFX Supervisor, Editor, Composer, or Actor. 25        (10) Paid for services rendered in Illinois. 26    For a production commencing on or after the effective date   SB1745- 9 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 2"Illinois labor expenditure" does not include: 3        (1) above-the-line spending exceeding 40% of the total 4    Illinois production spending for the production, unless 5    the Department determines, through a process specified by 6    administrative rule, that inclusion as an Illinois labor 7    expenditure of above-the-line spending for the production 8    in an amount that exceeds 40% of the production's total 9    Illinois production spending is necessary for the 10    production to meet the conditions set forth in subsection 11    (a) of Section 30; 12        (2) above-the-line spending paid to related parties 13    that exceeds, in the aggregate, 12% of the total Illinois 14    production spending for the production; or 15        (3) below-the-line spending paid to a related party 16    that exceeds the fair market value of the transaction. 17    "Illinois production spending" means the expenses incurred 18by the applicant for an accredited production that are 19reasonable under the circumstances, but does not include any 20monetary prize or the cost of any non-monetary prize awarded 21pursuant to a production in respect of a game, questionnaire, 22or contest. "Illinois production spending" includes, without 23limitation, unless otherwise specified in this definition, all 24of the following:25        (1) expenses to purchase, from vendors within 26    Illinois, tangible personal property that is used in the   SB1745- 10 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1    accredited production;2        (2) expenses to acquire services, from vendors in 3    Illinois, for film production, editing, or processing; and4        (3) for a production commencing before July 1, 2022, 5    the compensation, not to exceed $100,000 for any one 6    employee, for contractual or salaried employees who are 7    Illinois residents performing services with respect to the 8    accredited production. For a production commencing on or 9    after July 1, 2022, Illinois labor expenditure the 10    compensation, not to exceed $500,000 for any one employee, 11    for contractual or salaried employees who are Illinois 12    residents or nonresident employees, subject to the 13    limitations set forth under Section 10 of this Act; and . 14        (4) for a production commencing on or after the 15    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 16    Assembly, the fair market value of any transaction that 17    (i) is entered into between the taxpayer and a related 18    party or the taxpayer and an unrelated party, (ii) is for 19    the accredited production, and (iii) has terms that 20    reflect the fair market value of the transaction. 21    "Loan out company" means a personal service corporation or 22other entity that is under contract with the taxpayer to 23provide specified individual personnel, such as artists, crew, 24actors, producers, or directors for the performance of 25services used directly in a production. "Loan out company" 26does not include entities contracted with by the taxpayer to   SB1745- 11 -LRB104 10921 HLH 21003 b1provide goods or ancillary contractor services such as 2catering, construction, trailers, equipment, or 3transportation. 4    "Qualified production facility" means stage facilities in 5the State in which television shows and films are or are 6intended to be regularly produced and that contain at least 7one sound stage of at least 15,000 square feet.8    "Related party" means a party that is deemed to be related 9to the taxpayer by common ownership or control according to 10generally accepted accounting standards and generally accepted 11accounting principles. 12    "Unrelated party" means a party that is not a related 13party with respect to the taxpayer. 14    The Department shall adopt rules to implement the changes 15made to this Section within one year after the effective date 16of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 17    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1006, if 18any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 19with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 20Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 21Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 22whatever reason, is unauthorized. 23(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 24102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.)